District of Columbia statutes.
3-1210.07

Criminal penalties.

(a)

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter shall, upon conviction, be subject to imprisonment not to exceed 1 year, or a fine not to exceed $10,000, or both.

(b)

Any person who has been previously convicted under this chapter shall, upon conviction, be subject to imprisonment not to exceed 1 year, or a fine not to exceed $25,000, or both.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1007, 33 DCR 729
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-247, § 2(z), 42 DCR 457
1981 Ed., § 2-3310.7.